Mississippi, session 2026, HB1258.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. There shall be a special election held in the North Tippah School District on the question of the closing of Falkner Attendance Center.  The special election shall be held at the same time and in the same manner as the general election held on November 3, 2026.  The question on the ballot shall be "May the Board of Education of the North Tippah School District close Falkner Attendance Center?"  At the election, all qualified electors who reside in the North Tippah School District may vote on the question.  If a majority of the qualified electors vote "Yes" on the question, then the Board of Education of the North Tippah School District may close Falkner Attendance Center.  If a majority of the qualified electors vote "No" on the question, then the Board of Education of the North Tippah School District shall not close Falkner Attendance Center, and shall not propose to close Falkner Attendance Center at any time during the next eight (8) school years. SECTION 2.  Section 37-65-101, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 37-65-101.  In addition to all other power and authority which may now be vested in any board of trustees of any school district by the constitution or statutes, or both, of the State of Mississippi, any such board of trustees is * * *hereby vested with the authority to close any one or more or all schools in any school district when, in its discretion, it determines such closure to be to the best interest of a majority of the educable children of the territory served, or to the best interest of a majority of the children enrolled in any such school or schools, unless such closure is otherwise prohibited by law.  * * *Said The board of trustees is also vested with the authority, in its discretion, to close any one or more or all schools in any school district when such board, in its discretion, determines such closure will promote or preserve the public peace, order or tranquility of the district. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.